build/ka_GE.aff
	# This file was generated by ka_GE.spell script by Gabriel Margiani using words from word lists by:
	# - Dato Bumbeishvili (https://github.com/bumbeishvili/GeoWordsDatabase)
	# - Kevin Scannell (http://crubadan.org/) CC-BY 4.0

SET UTF-8
TRY აიესრმოდლნვბთუგხშცტკქწზყფპღძჩჯჭჰჟ
# This file is part of ge_KA.spell, (c) 2016 Gabriel Margiani

# Letters on the same key
REP 14
REP ღ რ
REP რ ღ
REP ტ თ
REP თ ტ
REP წ ჭ
REP ჭ წ
REP ს შ
REP შ ს
REP ზ ძ
REP ძ ზ
REP ც ჩ
REP ჩ ც
REP ჯ ჟ
REP ჟ ჯ 

MAP 7
MAP ქკგყ
MAP ტთდ
MAP ცძწ(თს)
MAP ჩჯჭ(დშ)
MAP სზ
MAP პფ
MAP გღ

# This should be one suffix, but since the wordlist doesn't contain all this
# forms most of the time, munch will not use it at all. 

SFX s Y 3
SFX s   ი       ები             ი
SFX s   ა       ები             ა
SFX s   0       ები             [ეოუ]

SFX b Y 3
SFX b   ი       ების            ი
SFX b   ა       ების            ა
SFX b   0       ების            [ეოუ]

SFX c Y 3
SFX c   ი       ებისა           ი
SFX c   ა       ებისა           ა
SFX c   0       ებისა           [ეოუ]

SFX d Y 3
SFX d   ი       ებს             ი
SFX d   ა       ებს             ა
SFX d   0       ებს             [ეოუ]

SFX e Y 3
SFX e   ი       ებმა            ი
SFX e   ა       ებმა            ა
SFX e   0       ებმა            [ეოუ]

SFX f Y 3
SFX f   ი       ებო             ი
SFX f   ა       ებო             ა
SFX f   0       ებო             [ეოუ]

SFX g Y 3
SFX g   ი       ებიც            ი
SFX g   ა       ებიც            ა
SFX g   0       ებიც            [ეოუ]

SFX h Y 3
SFX h   ი       ებისაც          ი
SFX h   ა       ებისაც          ა
SFX h   0       ებისაც          [ეოუ]

SFX j Y 3
SFX j   ი       ებით            ი
SFX j   ა       ებით            ა
SFX j   0       ებით            [ეოუ]

SFX k Y 3
SFX k   ი       ებად            ი
SFX k   ა       ებად            ა
SFX k   0       ებად            [ეოუ]

SFX l Y 2
SFX l   ი       მა              ი  
SFX l   0       მა              [აეოუ]  

SFX m Y 2
SFX m   ი       ს              ი  
SFX m   0       ს              [აეოუ]  

SFX n Y 3
SFX n   0       ს              [იოუ]  
SFX n   ა       ის              ა  
SFX n   ე       ის              ე  

SFX o Y 4
SFX o   0       თ               ი
SFX o   ა       ით              ა  
SFX o   ე       ით              ე  
SFX o   0       თი              [ოუ]  

SFX p Y 4
SFX p   ი       ად              ი
SFX p   0       ად              ა  
SFX p   ე       ად              ე  
SFX p   0       დ               [ოუ]  

SFX q Y 3
SFX q   ი       ო               ი
SFX q   0       ო               [აუ]  
SFX q   0       ვ               [ეო]  

SFX r Y 2
SFX r   ი       სა             ი  
SFX r   0       სა             [აეოუ]  

SFX t Y 4
SFX t   0       სა              ი  
SFX t   0       სი              [ოუ]  
SFX t   ა       ისა             ა  
SFX t   ე       ისა             ე  

SFX u Y 3
SFX u   0       თა              ი
SFX u   ა       ითა             ა  
SFX u   ე       ითა             ე  

SFX v Y 4
SFX v   ი       ადა             ი
SFX v   0       ადა             ა  
SFX v   ე       ადა             ე  
SFX v   0       და              [ოუ]  

# ა ჩა მო მი გა შე წა და გადა 
PFX A Y 1
PFX A   0       ა       .

PFX C Y 1
PFX C   0       ჩა      .

PFX I Y 1
PFX I   0       მი      .

PFX G Y 1
PFX G   0       გა      .

PFX S Y 1
PFX S   0       შე      .

PFX W Y 1
PFX W   0       წა      .

PFX D Y 1
PFX D   0       და      .

PFX V Y 1
PFX V   0       გადა    .


PFX Q Y 1
PFX Q   0       ამო     .

PFX F Y 1
PFX F   0       ჩამო    .

PFX O Y 1
PFX O   0       მო      .

PFX T Y 1
PFX T   0       გამო    .

PFX U Y 1
PFX U   0       შემო    .

PFX P Y 1
PFX P   0       წამო    .

PFX X Y 1
PFX X   0       გადმო   .

# არის
SFX a Y 1
SFX a   0       ა       [აეიოუ]

SFX i Y 2
SFX i   ი       ში      ი
SFX i   0       ში      [აეოუ]

# vim: set ts=8 et:
